ja: オフィス用品 > プレゼン用品: 黒板; 展示用ボード・パネル; 書画カメラ; ホワイトボード; イーゼルパッド; プレゼン用イーゼル; レーザーポインター; 講演台; OHPフィルム; プレゼン用リモコン
ro-RO: Consumabile de birou > Consumabile de prezentare: Table; Aviziere; Aparate foto pentru documente; Table de scris; Panouri tip șevalet; Șevalete; Arătătoare cu laser; Pupitre; Folii transparente; Arătătoare wireless pentru prezentări
zh-CN: 办公用品 > 演示用品: 黑板; 展示板; 实物投影仪; 白板; 活页挂板; 画架; 激光笔; 讲台; 幻灯片; 无线演示器
fi: Toimistotarvikkeet > Esitystarvikkeet: Liitutaulut; Esitystaulut; Dokumenttikamerat; Valkotaulut; Fläppitaulupaperi; Fläppitaulut; Laserosoittimet; Puhujakorokkeet; Piirtoheitinkalvot; Langattomat esityslaitteet
ko: 사무용품 > 프레젠테이션 용품: 칠판; 디스플레이 보드; 문서 카메라; 화이트보드; 이젤 패드; 이젤; 레이저 포인터; 강연대; 슬라이드; 무선 포인터
pl: Artykuły biurowe > Sprzęt do prezentacji: Tablice kredowe; Tablice do prezentacji; Rzutniki; Tablice suchościeralne; Flipcharty; Sztalugi; Wskaźniki laserowe; Pulpity; Foliogramy; Bezprzewodowe akcesoria do prezentacji
sl-SI: Pisarniški material > Pripomočki za predstavitve: Kredne table; Table za predstavitve; Dokumentne kamere; Table za suho brisanje; Samostoječe table; Stojala; Laserski kazalniki; Govorniški pulti; Prosojnice; Brezžični kazalnik za predstavitve
es: Material de oficina > Accesorios para presentaciones: Pizarras; Paneles de exposición; Cámara de documentos; Pizarras blancas; Rotafolios; Caballetes de oficina; Punteros láser; Atriles; Transparencias; Presentadores inalámbrico
fr: Fournitures de bureau > Matériel de présentation et d'affichage: Tableaux noirs; Affichages; Vidéo-visualiseurs numériques; Tableaux effaçables à sec; Chevalets de conférence; Chevalets de présentation; Pointeurs laser; Lutrins; Transparents; Télécommandes de présentation
nl: Kantoorartikelen > Presentatiebenodigdheden: Schoolborden; Presentatieborden; Documentcamera's; Whiteboards; Flipoverstandaarden; Ezels; Laserpointers; Lessenaars; Transparanten; Draadloze aanwijzers
tr: Büro Malzemeleri > Sunum Malzemeleri: Kara Tahtalar; Sergi Panoları; Doküman Kameraları; Beyaz Yazı Tahtası; Şövale Tahtaları; Şövaleler; Lazer Anahtarlıklar; Kürsüler; Tepegöz Saydamları; Kablosuz Sunum Kumandaları
th: อุปกรณ์สำนักงาน > อุปกรณ์นำเสนองาน: กระดานดำ; ป้ายนิเทศ; เครื่องฉายเอกสาร; ไวท์บอร์ด; แผ่นขาตั้งกระดาษ; ขาตั้ง; ตัวชี้เลเซอร์; โพเดียมแบบมีที่วางเอกสาร; แผ่นใส; ตัวควบคุมการนำเสนอแบบไร้สาย
sv: Kontorsmaterial > Presentationsmaterial: Svarta tavlor; Presentationstavlor; Dokumentkameror; Whiteboards; Blädderblock; Blädderblocksställ; Laserpekare; Talarstolar; OH-apparater; Trådlös presentationsutrustning
pt-PT: Materiais de escritório > Materiais de apresentação: Quadros negros; Quadros de apresentação; Câmaras para documentos; Quadros brancos; Blocos para cavalete; Cavaletes de pintura; Apontadores laser; Atris; Acetatos; Apresentadores sem fios
de: Bürobedarf > Präsentationsbedarf: Schreibtafeln; Ausstellungstafeln; Dokumentenkameras; Whiteboards; Flipchart-Blöcke; Flipcharts; Laserpointer; Lesepulte; Folien; Präsentationsfernbedienungen
vi: Văn phòng phẩm > Thiết bị thuyết trình: Bảng phấn; Bảng hiển thị; Máy ảnh tài liệu; Bảng lau khô; Đệm giá vẽ; Giá vẽ; Bút chỉ laze; Bục giảng; Giấy bóng kính; Thiết bị thuyết trình không dây
el: Προμήθειες γραφείου > Αναλώσιμα παρουσίασης: Πίνακες κιμωλίας; Πίνακες προβολής; Κάμερες εγγράφων; Πίνακες στεγνής διαγραφής; Μπλοκ καβαλέτων; Καβαλέτα; Δείκτες λέιζερ; Αναλόγια; Διαφάνειες; Ασύρματοι παρουσιαστές
nb: Kontormateriell > Presentasjonsutstyr: Krittavler; Presentasjonstavler; Dokumentkameraer; Whiteboards; Flippoverblokker; Flippovere; Laserpekere; Talerstoler; Transparenter; Trådløse presentatorer
cs: Kancelářské potřeby > Prezentační materiály: Tabule na psaní křídou; Výstavní plochy; Snímací kamery; Bílé tabule; Papír na tabuli; Tabule s papírem; Laserová ukazovátka; Pultíky; Fólie; Nástroje pro bezdrátové prezentace
da: Kontorforsyning > Præsentationsmaterialer: Skrivetavler; Præsentationstavler; Dokumentkameraer; Whiteboards; Flipoverblokke; Staffelier; Laserpegepinde; Læsepulte; Transparenter; Trådløse præsentationsprodukter
zh-TW: 辦公室用品 > 簡報用品: 黑板; 展示板; 實物提示機; 白板; 掛板簿; 畫架; 雷射筆; 講臺; 透明膠片/投影片; 無線簡報器
sk-SK: Kancelárske potreby > Potreby na prezentáciu: Kriedové tabule; Prezentačné tabule; Spätné projektory; Popisovacie tabule; Stojanové podložky; Stojany; Laserové ukazovátka; Rečnícke pulty; Priehľadné fólie; Bezdrôtové prezentačné zariadenia
lt-LT: Biuro reikmenys > Pristatymų reikmenys: Lentos; Ekranai; Dokumentų kameros; Sausojo trynimo lentos; Molbertų bloknotai; Molbertai; Lazerinės rodyklės; Tribūnos; Skaidrės; Belaidžiai pristatymų nuotolinio valdymo pultai
pt-BR: Materiais de escritório > Suprimentos para apresentações: Quadros de giz; Quadros de exibição; Câmeras para documentos; Quadros brancos; Blocos para cavalete; Cavaletes; Indicadores a laser; Apoio para livros e discursos; Transparências; Apresentadores sem fio
hr-HR: Uredski materijal > Prezentacijski pribor: Ploče; Ploče za prezentaciju; Kamera za skeniranje dokumenata; Ploče za suho brisanje; Ploča na stalku; Slikarski stalci; Laserski pokazivači; Govornice; Grafoskopi; Bežični prezenteri
it: Forniture per ufficio > Forniture per presentazioni: Lavagne; Pannelli di visualizzazione; Visualizzatori; Lavagne bianche; Lavagne a fogli mobili; Cavalletti da presentazione; Puntatori laser; Supporti per lettura; Lucidi; Presentatori wireless
en: Office Supplies > Presentation Supplies: Chalkboards; Display Boards; Document Cameras; Dry-Erase Boards; Easel Pads; Easels; Laser Pointers; Lecterns; Transparencies; Wireless Presenters
hu: Irodai kellékek > Prezentációs kellékek: Palatáblák; Kijelzőtáblák; Dokumentumkamerák; Törölhető táblák; Táblaállványpárnák; Táblaállványok; Lézeres mutatók; Előadók; Átlátszó fóliák; Vezeték nélküli prezentálók
ru: Товары для офиса и канцтовары > Товары для проведения презентаций: Меловые доски; Презентационные и выставочные доски; Документ-камеры; Маркерные доски; Бумага для флипчартов; Флипчарты; Лазерные указки; Кафедры; Прозрачные листы; Беспроводные презентеры
bg-BG: Офис консумативи > Консумативи за презентации: Дъски за писане с тебешир; Табла; Камери за документи; Дъски за сухо изтриване; Хартия за статив; Стативи; Лазерни показалки; Катедри; Прозрачно прожекционно фолио; Безжични презентатори